Missouri, session 2026, HB3400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.392, to read as follows:
9.392. December first each year is hereby designated as "Freeman Bosley, Sr.
2 Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to celebrate the legendary St. Louis City politician who retired in
4 2017 after thirty years of service to the city and was an advocate for young people
5 participating in government and engaging in public service.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.